Washington statutes.
RCW 11.106.050

Account filed—Return day—Notice.

When any account has been filed pursuant to RCW 11.106.030 or 11.106.040, the clerk of the court where filed shall fix a return day therefor as provided in RCW 11.96A.100(4) and issue a notice. The notice shall state the time and place for the return date, the name or names of the trustee or trustees who have filed the account, that the account has been filed, that the court is asked to settle the account, and that any objections or exceptions to the account must be filed with the clerk of the court on or before the return date. The notice shall be given as provided for notices under RCW 11.96A.110.

[ 1999 c 42 s 628; 1985 c 30 s 99. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 132; 1955 c 33 s 30.30.050; prior: 1951 c 226 s 5. Formerly RCW 30.30.050.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 c 42: See RCW 11.96A.902.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.